District of Columbia statutes.
5-713

Involuntary separation from service.

If any member is injured or contracts a disease during his first 5 years of service in his department which, in the judgment of the Board of Police and Fire Surgeons, disables him from performing further duty in his department, and if the Police and Firefighters Retirement and Relief Board finds that such injury or disease was not incurred in the performance of duty in his department, such member shall, upon the approval of such finding by the head of his department, and without regard for the provisions of any other law or regulation, be separated from the service.

History

Sept. 1, 1916, ch. 433, § 12(i)
Aug. 21, 1957, 71 Stat. 395, Pub. L. 85-157, § 3
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-198, § 4(b), 61 DCR 12450

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-107.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-619.
1973 Ed., § 4-529.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-198 substituted “Police and Firefighters Retirement and Relief Board” for “Police and Firemen's Retirement and Relief Board.”

Editor's Notes

Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability Act: Section 3(r) of Pub. L. 85-157 provided that this section may be cited as part of the Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability Act.